Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.050

ESD board—Members—Nine member boards.

Any educational service district board may elect by resolution of the board to increase the board member size to nine board members. In such case positions number eight and nine shall be filled at the next election called by the executive director of the Washington state school directors' association, position numbered eight to be for a term of two years, position numbered nine to be for a term of four years. Thereafter the terms for such positions shall be for four years.

[ 2022 c 79 s 4; 2006 c 263 s 604; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 19; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 6; 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.21.0304.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 75: See note following RCW 28A.310.030.